Illinois, session 104th, SB1292.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Anti-Click Gambling Data Analytics Collection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act, "remote 7gambling" means gambling in which persons participate by the 8use of remote communication, such as the Internet, telephone, 9television, radio, or any other kind of electronic or other 10technology for facilitating communication. 11    Section 10. Data collection prohibited. An entity that 12operates a remote gambling platform or a subsidiary of the 13entity shall not collect data from a participant with the 14intent to predict how the participant will gamble in a 15particular gambling or betting scenario. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.